apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="sm/elle__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>ollen</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>elt</l>   <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ollen</l> <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>elt</l>   <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>elte</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>elte</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ellande</l><r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<!-- wsd todo -->
<e>       <p><l>ell</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ell</l><r>elle</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ellast</l><r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>elt</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>eller</l> <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ell</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>all</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>elte</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/yggje__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>oggen</l>  <r>yggje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oggen</l> <r>yggje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogge</l>  <r>yggje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oggi</l>  <r>yggje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogne</l>  <r>yggje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogne</l>  <r>yggje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yggjande</l><r>yggje<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>ygg</l>   <r>yggje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yggj</l><r>yggje</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>yggjast</l><r>yggje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogge</l>  <r>yggje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oggi</l>  <r>yggje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ygg</l>   <r>yggje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogg</l>   <r>yggje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="n/yte__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>oten</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oten</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ote</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>otne</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>otne</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ytande</l><r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>yt</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yt</l><r>yte</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ytast</l> <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ote</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yt</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>aut</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dr/age__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>egen</l>   <r>age<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>egen</l>  <r>age<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ege</l>   <r>age<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>egi</l>   <r>age<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>egne</l>  <r>age<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>egne</l>  <r>age<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>agande</l><r>age<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>ag</l>    <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ag</l><r>age</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>agast</l> <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ege</l>   <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>egi</l>   <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>eg</l>    <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>og</l>    <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/yve__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>oven</l>   <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oven</l>  <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ove</l>   <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ovi</l>   <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ovne</l>  <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ovne</l>  <r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yvande</l><r>yve<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>yv</l>    <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yv</l><r>yve</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>yvast</l> <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ove</l>   <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ovi</l>   <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yv</l>    <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>auv</l>   <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="skadeskyte">  <i>skadesk</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyte">            <i>n</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skyte">           <i>sk</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avbryte"><i>avbr</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forbryte"><i>forbr</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortryte"><i>fortr</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gyve"><i>g</i><par n="g/yve__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="klyve"><i>kl</i><par n="g/yve__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="prøveskyte"><i>prøvesk</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ryte"><i>r</i><par n="n/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="smelle"><i>sm</i><par n="sm/elle__vblex_adj"/></e>
